Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Chapter 47. Municipal Debt.

Collateral references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 533 et seq.

64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1571 et seq.

Validity of municipal bond issue as against owners of property annexation to municipality which became effective after date of election at which issue was approved by voters. 10 ALR2d 559.

Adverse impact upon existing business as factor affecting validity and substantive requisites of issuance, by state or local governmental agencies, of economic development bonds in support of private business enterprise. 39 ALR4th 1096.